Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3774.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.222, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4b. new text end new text begin Stopping for yellow light. new text end new text begin (a) A bicycle operator who approaches an intersection controlled by a traffic-control signal exhibiting a steady yellow light, as described in section 169.06, subdivision 5, must stop before entering the intersection or the nearest crosswalk. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this subdivision alters the right-of-way requirements under section 169.20. The provisions under this subdivision do not apply when traffic is controlled by a peace officer or a person authorized to control traffic under section 169.06. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end